test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-cahcahkayo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - cahcahkayo - ok : # -m animate noun, blackbird
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Sg: cahcahkâýow
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Pl: cahcahkâýowak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Loc: cahcahkâýôhk 
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: cahcahkâýôsis
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: cahcahkâýôsisak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: cahcahkâýôsisihk

     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicahcahkâýôm
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicahcahkâýôm
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocahcahkâýôma
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocahcahkâýômiyiwa
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicahcahkâýôminân
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicahcahkâýôminaw
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicahcahkâýômiwâw
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocahcahkâýômiwâwa
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocahcahkâýômiyiwa

     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicahcahkâýômak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicahcahkâýômak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocahcahkâýôma
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocahcahkâýômiyiwa
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicahcahkâýôminânak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicahcahkâýôminawak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicahcahkâýômiwâwak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocahcahkâýômiwâwa
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ocahcahkâýômiyiwa

     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicahcahkâýômisis
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicahcahkâýômisis
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocahcahkâýômisisa
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocahcahkâýômisisiyiwa
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicahcahkâýômisisinân
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicahcahkâýômisisinaw
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicahcahkâýômisisiwâw
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocahcahkâýômisisiwâwa
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocahcahkâýômisisiyiwa

     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicahcahkâýômisisak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicahcahkâýômisisak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocahcahkâýômisisa
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocahcahkâýômisisiyiwa
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicahcahkâýômisisinânak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicahcahkâýômisisinawak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicahcahkâýômisisiwâwak
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocahcahkâýômisisiwâwa
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ocahcahkâýômisisiyiwa

     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicahcahkâýômihk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicahcahkâýômihk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocahcahkâýômihk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocahcahkâýômiyihk 
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicahcahkâýôminâhk # kicahcahkâýominâhk ?
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicahcahkâýôminâhk 
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicahcahkâýômiwâhk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocahcahkâýômiwâhk 
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocahcahkâýômiyihk # ocahcahkâýomiyiwihk?

     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicahcahkâýômisisihk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicahcahkâýômisisihk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocahcahkâýômisisihk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocahcahkâýômisisiyihk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicahcahkâýômisisinâhk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicahcahkâýômisisinâhk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicahcahkâýômisisiwâhk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocahcahkâýômisisiwâhk
     cahcahkâýow+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocahcahkâýômisisiyihk
